Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska88-535
Scale ticket; issuance; prima facie evidence.

Each warehouse licensee shall, at the time of the delivery of grain to or the shipment of grain from a warehouse, issue a lawful scale ticket to the owner or consignee of such grain, except when the delivery or shipment is by rail or water. The scale tickets shall contain all information prescribed by the commission. A scale ticket issued by a warehouse licensee shall be prima facie evidence of the holder's claim of title to the goods described in such ticket.

Laws 1987, LB 164, § 11.